apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<pardef n="tryk/ke__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>kede</l>      <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>kete</l>      <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>kede</l>      <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>kete</l>      <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kende</l>     <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>k</l>         <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ker</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="br/yte__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>utt</l>       <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utt</l>       <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utte</l>      <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utte</l>      <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytende</l>    <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>yt</l>        <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yte</l>       <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytes</l>      <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utt</l>       <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yter</l>      <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytes</l>      <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aut</l>       <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øt</l>        <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sk/yte__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>utt</l>       <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utt</l>       <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utte</l>      <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utte</l>      <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytende</l>    <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>yt</l>        <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yte</l>       <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytes</l>      <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utt</l>       <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yter</l>      <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytes</l>      <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aut</l>       <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jøt</l>       <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fr/yse__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ossen</l>     <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>osset</l>     <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yst</l>       <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osset</l>     <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yst</l>       <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osne</l>      <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yste</l>      <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osne</l>      <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yste</l>      <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysende</l>    <r>yse<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yse</l>       <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yses</l>      <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>osset</l>     <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yst</l>       <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yser</l>      <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yses</l>      <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aus</l>       <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yste</l>      <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øs</l>        <r>yse<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/a__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>add</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>add</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>adde</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>adde</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agende</l>     <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ag</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>age</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ages</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>add</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ager</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ages</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bryte">           <i>br</i><par n="br/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="trykke">          <i>tryk</i><par n="tryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="uttrykke">          <i>uttryk</i><par n="tryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bidra">           <i>bidr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skyte">           <i>sk</i><par n="sk/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="dra">             <i>dr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skadeskyte">      <i>skadesk</i><par n="sk/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bunnfryse">       <i>bunnfr</i><par n="fr/yse__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avbryte"><i>avbr</i><par n="br/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avdra"><i>avdr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bedra"><i>bedr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="botnfryse"><i>botnfr</i><par n="fr/yse__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drage"><i>dr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fordra"><i>fordr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forfryse"><i>forfr</i><par n="fr/yse__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fryse"><i>fr</i><par n="fr/yse__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="inndra"><i>inndr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oppdra"><i>oppdr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="overdra"><i>overdr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="prøveskyte"><i>prøvesk</i><par n="sk/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pådra"><i>pådr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skamfryse"><i>skamfr</i><par n="fr/yse__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="småfryse"><i>småfr</i><par n="fr/yse__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stivfryse"><i>stivfr</i><par n="fr/yse__vblex_adj"/></e>
